src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_ODD !ságastit
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:a%>v #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:a%> #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:a%> #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:%> #; !ságast, usjut
+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+V+Ind+Prs+Du2:ä%>hppen #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du3:e%>ba #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:i%>p #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:e%>hppit #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%> #; 

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%> #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i%>j #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du1:i%>jmen #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du2:i%>jden #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du3:i%>jga #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:i%>jme #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:i%>jde #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+V+Imprt+Sg2:e%> #; 
+V+Imprt+Sg2+Use/NG:ä%> #; 
+V+Imprt+Sg2+Use/NG:i%> #; 
+V+Imprt+Du2:e%>hten # ; 
+V+Imprt+Pl2:i%>httit #;

+V+Inf:i%>t # ; 
+V+GerII:i%>men # ;
+V+PrfPrc:a%>m # ;
+V+ConNeg:e%> # ; 
+V+PrsPrc:ä%>ddje # ; 
+V+Vsubst:i%> V_SUBST_ODD_s2 ; 
!+V+GerI:a%>din # ;  
!+V+Sup:a%>tjit # ; ! even Lehtiranta's paradigm 1992:153 doesn't have this
!+VGen:%> #; !keeping as comment for now, but replaced with verb.adv. in next line
!+Der/VAdv+Adv:%>n #; !

+V+Pot:a%>tj V_ODD_POT ;


LEXICON V_ODD_UA ! luaddanit (not luoddanit! class for ua/uä + noCG CCenter)
:^UAUML V_ODD ;


LEXICON V_ODD_UT ! vierábut, giehpebut (Adj+Comp+Inf) !most of these suffixes should be checked!
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:u%>v #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:u%> #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:u%> #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:%> #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:i%>n #; 
+V+Ind+Prs+Du2:ä%>hppen #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du3:e%>ba #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:i%>p #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:i%>hppit #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:i%> #; 

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:i%>v #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:i%> #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:i%>j #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du1:i%>jmen #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du2:i%>jden #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du3:i%>jga #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:i%>jme #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:i%>jde #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:i%>n #; 

+V+Imprt+Sg2:e%> #; 
+V+Imprt+Du2:e%>hten # ; 
+V+Imprt+Pl2:i%>httit #;

+V+Inf:u%>t # ; 
+V+GerII:i%>men # ;
+V+PrfPrc:u%>m # ;
+V+ConNeg:e%> # ; 
+V+PrsPrc:ä%>ddje # ; 
+V+Vsubst:u%> V_SUBST_ODD_s2 ; 
!+V+GerI:a%>din # ;  
!+V+Sup:a%>tjit # ;
!+VGen:%> #; !keeping as comment for now, but replaced with verb.adv. in next line
!+Der/VAdv+Adv:%>n #; !



!V_ODD POT forms -- check!
+V+Pot:a%>tj V_ODD_POT ;

!POT forms for V_ODD
LEXICON V_ODD_POT !
!+Sg1:a%>v #;
!+Sg2:a%> #;
+Sg3:a%> #;
+Sg3+Use/NG:%> #;
!+Du1:i%>n #; 
!+Du2:ä%>hppen #;
!+Du3:e%>ba #;
!+Pl1:i%>p #;
!+Pl2:i%>hppit #;
!+Pl3:i%> #; 





!! # contracted verbs

LEXICON V_CONTR !välldut, tjerrut
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>v #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%> #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>ja #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du1:%>jin #; 
+V+Ind+Prs+Du2:%>bähttin #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Du3:%>ba #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>p #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>bihttit #;
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ji #; 

+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>jiv #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>ji #; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>j #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/NG:%>jij #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du1:%>jmin #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du2:%>jdin #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Du3:%>j 3DUPRT ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>jme #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>jde #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1+Use/NG:%>jmä #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2+Use/NG:%>jdä #;
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>jin #; 

+V+Imprt+Sg2:%> #; 
!+V+Imprt+Du2:%>hten # ; 
!+V+Imprt+Pl2:%>httit #;

+V+Inf:%>t # ; 
+V+GerII:%>min # ;
+V+PrfPrc:%>m # ;
+V+ConNeg:%> # ; 
+V+PrsPrc:%>jäddje # ; 
+V+Vsubst:%>m V_SUBST_EVEN_s2 ; !cf. sujjtim (sje19360100a.001)
!+V+GerI:%>din # ;  
+V+Sup:%>tjit # ;
!+VGen:%> #; !keeping as comment for now, but replaced with verb.adv. in next line
!+Der/VAdv+Adv:%>n #; !

!V_CONTR POT forms -- check!
+V+Pot:%>tj V_CONTR_POT ;

!POT forms for V_CONTR
LEXICON V_CONTR_POT !
+Sg1:a%>v #;
+Sg2:a%> #;
+Sg3:a%> #;
+Sg3+Use/NG:%> #;
+Du1:i%>n #; 
+Du2:ä%>hppen #;
+Du3:e%>ba #;
+Pl1:i%>p #;
+Pl2:i%>hppit #;
+Pl3:i%> #; 


LEXICON V_CONTR_UVVUT ! variation in derived (passive) stems -uvºvut (~uvvat)
:u V_CONTR ; !standard inflectional class: tjalmeduvºvut -j-
+Use/NG: V_EVEN_A ; !variant inflectional class: tjalmeduvvat



!! # Auxiliaries

LEXICON COPULA !
lä: LE "copula/auxiliary verb" ; !!= * @CODE@ 

LEXICON LE !!= * @CODE@ 
+V+Ind+Prs: LEPRS ; 
+V+Ind+Prt: LEPRT ; 
+V+Ind+Pot: LEPOT ;
+V+PrfPrc:lam K ; ! lä (conneg) + *am (prfprc allomorph of *lä*)
+V+Inf:årrot K ; !infinitive
+V+ConNeg:lä K ; !connegative

LEXICON LEPRS !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg1:läv # ; 
+Sg1+Use/NG:lev # ; 
+Sg2:lä # ;  
+Sg2+Use/NG:le # ;  
+Sg2:'l # ; !enclitic (only attaches to vowel-final preceding word) !apostrophe tokenized separately, which is not ideal
+Sg3:lä # ; 
+Sg3:'l # ; !enclitic (only attaches to vowel-final preceding word) !apostrophe tokenized separately, which is not ideal
!+Sg3:le # ; 
+Du1:lin # ; 
!+Du1:len # ; 
+Du2:lihpen # ; 
+Du2:lähppen # ;  
+Du3:läba # ; 
+Du3+Use/NG:läbá # ; 
+Pl1:läp # ; 
+Pl1:lip # ; 
!+Pl1:lep # ; 
+Pl2:lihpit # ; 
+Pl2:lehpit # ; 
+Pl3:lä # ;
+Pl3:l # ; !enclitic (only attaches to vowel-final preceding word)

LEXICON LEPRT !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg1:lijjiv    # ; 
+Sg1:lidjiv    # ;  
+Sg1:liv    # ;  
+Sg2:lijji    # ; 
+Sg2:lidji    # ;  
+Sg3:lij    # ; 
+Du1:lijmen # ; 
+Du1:liejme # ; 
+Du2:lijden # ;
+Du2:liejde # ; 
+Du3:lij 3DUPRT ;
+Du3:liej 3DUPRT ; 
+Pl1:lijme # ; 
+Pl1:liejme # ; 
+Pl2:lijde # ;
+Pl2:liejde # ; 
+Pl3:lidjin    # ;  
+Pl3:lijjin    # ; 
+Pl3:lin    # ; 

LEXICON LEPOT
+Sg1:lidtjav # ; 
+Sg2:lidtja # ; 
+Sg3:litj # ; 
+Du1:lidtjin # ; 
+Du2:lidtjabehttin # ; 
+Du3:lidtjaba # ; 
+Du3:lidtjaban # ; 
+Pl1:lidtjap # ;  
+Pl2:lidtjabihttit # ; 
+Pl3:lidtji # ; 


!LEXICON ATJA !!= * @CODE@ !!! originally in ACSj:  ATJA "skola" ;  !!= * @CODE@  ???
!atja+V+Ind+Prs: ATJAPRS ; 
!atja+V+Ind+Prt: ATJAPRT ; 
!
!
!LEXICON ATJAPRS !!= * @CODE@ 
!+Sg1:atjav      # ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
!+Sg2:atjah      # ; 
!+Sg3:atja       # ; 
!+Du1:itjin      # ; 
!+Du2:atjabihten # ; 
!+Du3:atjaba     # ; 
!+Pl1:atjap      # ; 
!+Pl2:atjabihtit # ; 
!+Pl3:itjih      # ; 
!
!LEXICON ATJAPRT !!= * @CODE@ 
!+Sg1:itjiv    # ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
!+Sg2:itjih    # ; 
!+Sg3:atjaj    # ; 
!+Du1:atjajmen # ; 
!+Du2:atjajden # ; 
!+Du3:atjajgan # ; 
!+Pl1:atjajmeh # ; 
!+Pl2:atjajdeh # ; 
!+Pl3:itjin    # ; 

LEXICON IJ !!= * @CODE@ 
!+V+Ind+Prs: IJPRS ;
!+V+Ind+Prt: IJPRT ;
!+V+Imprt: IJIMP ;
+V+Neg+Prs: IJPRS ;
+V+Neg+Prt: IJPRT ;
+V+Neg+Imprt: IJIMP ;

!cf. +V+PrfPrc:lam # ; ! lä (BE.conneg) + *am (prfprc allomorph of *lä*)
!check tags!
+V+Neg+Prs+Pl3#lä+ConNeg#lä+PrfPrc:iellam K ; ! = e+lam
+V+Neg+Prs+Pl3#lä+ConNeg#lä+PrfPrc:ällam K ; ! = e+lam
+V+Neg+Prs+Sg3#lä+ConNeg#lä+PrfPrc:idtjam K ; ! = idtjij+lam

LEXICON IJPRS !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg1:iv    K ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg2:i    K ; 
+Sg3:ij    K ; 
+Sg3+Use/NG:ijja    K ; ! long form for short answers, cf. sje20150329b.138, pit080924.487/.489
+Du1:ien K ; 
+Du2:iehpen K ;   
+Du3:iebá K ; 
+Pl1:iep K ; 
+Pl1+Use/NG:iehpe K ; 
+Pl2:ihpit K ;  
+Pl3:ie   K ;
+Pl3+Use/NG:e   K ;
+Pl3#lä+V+ConNeg:ällä K ; ! = e+lä

LEXICON IJPRT !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg1:idtjiv    K ;  !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg2:idtji    K ; 
+Sg3:idtjij    K ; 
+Du1+Use/NG:iejmen K ; 
+Du1:idtjijmen K ; 
+Du2+Use/NG:iejden  K ; 
+Du2:idtjijden K ; 
+Du3+Use/NG:iejgan 3DUPRT ; 
+Du3:idtjijga 3DUPRT ; 
+Pl1+Use/NG:iejme K ; 
+Pl1:idtjijme K ; 
+Pl2+Use/NG:iejde K ; 
+Pl2:idtjijde K ; 
+Pl3:idtjin    K ;


LEXICON IJIMP !!= * @CODE@ 
+Sg2:iele  K ; 
+Sg2+Use/NG:ilu  K ; 
+Du2:iellen K ; 
+Du2+Use/NG:illun K ; 
+Pl2:iellet  K ;
+Pl2+Use/NG:illut  K ;


LEXICON 3DUPRS !variation in 3rd-DUAL-Presence suffixes for EVEN stems
:ba # ;
+Use/NG:ban # ;

LEXICON 3DUPRT !variation in 3rd-DUAL-Preterite suffixes for EVEN and CONTRACTED stems
:ga # ;
+Use/NG:gan # ;


! +Vsubst / actio initially (based somewhat on saL for now)
LEXICON V_SUBST_EVEN_s2 !båhtem, båhtema, båhtemin, båhtemijn
+Nom: # ;
+Cmp/SgNom: R ;
+Gen:a # ;
!+Ess:in # ;
+Com:ijn # ; !cf. pit090609a.164 gullimijn "with the fishing"

LEXICON V_SUBST_ODD_s2 !málestibme, málestime, málestimen, málestimijn
+Nom:bme # ; !cf. no. 5234 ságastibme "conversation"
+Nom+Use/NG:m # ; !cf. sje20231218a.079 fielastim "travel/journey"
!+Cmp/SgNom: R ;
+Gen:me # ;
!+Ess:men # ;
!+Com:mijn # ;
