src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb   !!= * **@CODE@** is the main lexicon
COPULA ; ! Redirects aux/copula to get proper handling of 'l (see affixes/verbs.lexc)
ij: IJ "negation verb" ; !!= * @CODE@ 
bissut:bissu V_CONTR "be roasted, be grilled" ; ! no. 91557
bulltjit:bulltji V_CONTR "form ice crust on rocks" ; ! no. 204
bäkktjit:bä2kktji V_CONTR "hurt someone" ; ! no. 3947
dipptjit:dipptji V_CONTR "press down" ; ! no. 5658
dullit:dulli V_CONTR "heat, stoke" ; ! no. 90642
fevvrit:fevvri V_CONTR "transport" ; ! no. 5549
gessut:gessu V_CONTR "be drawn, be pulled" ; ! no. 5252
gurrpit:gurrpi V_CONTR "bundle together" ; ! no. 3510
hivvát:hivvá V_CONTR "become thin, become sick" ; ! no. 3921
luddit:luddi V_CONTR "chop bone, wood" ; ! no. 1979
mehttit:mehtti V_CONTR "measure" ; ! no. 2559
nuhkkut:nuhkku V_CONTR "be finished, be depleted" ; ! no. 91620
rijjdit:rijjdi V_CONTR "ride (a reindeer or horse)" ; ! no. 5676
sirrvit:sirrvi V_CONTR "slaughter a reindeer bull or bull moose" ; ! no. 1547
skäbbmit:skä2bbmi V_CONTR "admonish severely" ; ! no. 4652
snirrit:snirri V_CONTR "itch" ; ! no. 1696
stuvvsit:stuvvsi V_CONTR "play around with one another" ; ! no. 1743
telltit:tellti V_CONTR "camp, tent" ; ! no. 3520
tsevvut:tsevvu V_CONTR "become hardpack (for snow)" ; ! no. 90745
vujdnut:vujdnu V_CONTR "be seen" ; ! no. 2165
bájneduvvut:bájneduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "get painted" ; ! no. 90149
báneduvvut:báneduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "became toothless" ; ! no. 90150
bieljeduvvut:bieljeduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "become deaf" ; ! no. 175
bijnastuvvut:bijnastuvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be tortured" ; ! no. 4217
dagaduvvut:dagaduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be done" ; ! no. 90154
dielmoduvvut:dielmoduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be trampled, stomped on" ; ! no. 5533
fámoduvvut:fámoduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "become powerless, strengthless" ; ! no. 4187
gåhtjoduvvut:gåhtjoduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be commanded, be called" ; ! no. 3231
ieljaduvvut:ieljaduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be weak" ; ! no. 5892
idjaduvvut+Use/NG:ijjaduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be forced to sleep over due to the (suprizing) onset of night" ; ! no. 91086
lånestuvvut:lånestuvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be saved, be redeemed" ; ! no. 4135
måraduvvut:måraduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "become angry" ; ! no. 91325
nammaduvvut:nammaduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be named" ; ! no. 91444
náraduvvut:náraduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be nailed, be plugged" ; ! no. 91434
tjalmeduvvut:tjalmeduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "go blind, lose vision" ; ! no. 1876
tjiegaduvvut:tjiegaduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "become hidden" ; ! no. 3896
tjuorgaduvvut:tju^Orgaduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "paint" ; ! no. 90367
tsábmestuvvut:tsábmestuvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be hit down, knocked down" ; ! no. 90911
vaddeduvvut:vaddeduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be given" ; ! no. 91411
válldeduvvut:válldeduvv V_CONTR_UVVUT "be taken" ; ! no. 90389
balvadit:balvad2 V_ODD "become cloudy" ; ! no. 5737
bitjádit:bitjád2 V_ODD "complain" ; ! no. 5776
bähturit:bä2htur V_ODD "run, hide, escape" ; ! no. 6220
dujtusit:dujtus V_ODD "hurry up, stress" ; ! no. 387
fieradit:fierad2 V_ODD "perish, die" ; ! no. 474
gárgadit:gárgad2 V_ODD "walk in a line (for reindeer)" ; ! no. 541
girdudit:girdud2 V_ODD "twist" ; ! no. 598
gåbdedit:gåbded2 V_ODD "widen" ; ! no. 3403
hiebadit:hiebad2 V_ODD "adapt" ; ! no. 3109
jalkahit:jalkah V_ODD "lie fully spread out" ; ! no. 916
käffidit:kä2ffid2 V_ODD "take a coffee break" ; ! no. 4749
luotkedit:luotked2 V_ODD "untie a skein of yarn; have diarrhea" ; ! no. 6550
mulsustit:mulsust V_ODD "change clothes quickly" ; ! no. 4986
njalkadit:njalkad2 V_ODD "slip, slide" ; ! no. 4194
rájdnodit:rájdnod2 V_ODD "clean" ; ! no. 91294
råhkålit:råhkål V_ODD "pray to god" ; ! no. 1455
sjivdnjedit:sjivdnjed2 V_ODD "create (in religious sense)" ; ! no. 1571
skuolkedit:skuolked2 V_ODD "clank, rattle" ; ! no. 4109
tjaradit:tjarad2 V_ODD "push trough" ; ! no. 3756
tsivdnjedit:tsivdnjed2 V_ODD "smell smoky (eg. for clothes)" ; ! no. 2011
vuolmastit:vu^Olmast V_ODD "get water in one’s shoes while fording" ; ! no. 4362
duabbalit:du^Obbal V_ODD_UA "pull towards oneself quickly" ; ! no. 3472
luaddanit:lu^Oddan V_ODD_UA "crack, split" ; ! no. 3410
tjuadtjadit:tjuadtjad2 V_ODD_UA "remain standing" ; ! no. 5338
tjuädtjelit:tju^Odtjel V_ODD_UA "get up, stand up" ; ! no. 4647
giehpebut:giehpeb2 V_ODD_UT "make easier, simplify" ; ! no. 4821
vierábut:vieráb2 V_ODD_UT "become worse, worsen" ; ! no. 5490
